Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-502
Sections; administration.

The department shall administer and enforce the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569 and may make rules and regulations necessary for its administration.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 2, p. 484.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.